Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1109
Rules and regulations.

The Public Employees Retirement Board shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to establish reasonable procedures to determine the qualified status of domestic relations orders and to administer distributions under such orders. Such procedures shall allow an alternate payee to designate a representative for receipt of copies of notices.

Laws 1996, LB 1273, § 9.